Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.030

Legislative action of local executive or legislative officials.

No legislative action taken by a local legislative body, its members, or local executive officials shall be invalidated by an application of the appearance of fairness doctrine.

[ 1982 c 229 s 3.]